Maryland, session 2026, HB0645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
8–906.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “ASSISTED REPRODUCTIVE TREATMENT”
MEANS A METHOD OF CAUSING PREGNANCY OTHER THAN THROUGH SEXUAL
INTERCOURSE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0645*

HOUSE BILL 645
(2) “ASSISTED REPRODUCTIVE TREATMENT” INCLUDES:
(I) DONATION OF EGGS OR SPERM;
(II) DONATION OF EMBRYOS;
(III) INTRACYTOPLASMIC SPERM INJECTION;
(IV) INTRAUTERINE OR INTRACERVICAL INSEMINATION; AND
(V) IN VITRO FERTILIZATION AND EMBRYO TRANSFER.
(B) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT INTENTIONALLY OR KNOWINGLY PROVIDE
ASSISTED REPRODUCTIVE TREATMENT TO ANOTHER USING THE PERSON’S SPERM
OR OVUM WITHOUT THE OTHER’S WRITTEN CONSENT TO ASSISTED REPRODUCTIVE
TREATMENT USING THE PERSON’S SPERM OR OVUM.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 10 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH.
(C) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IS
LIABLE FOR CIVIL DAMAGES IN AN ACTION BROUGHT BY:
(I) THE WOMAN WHO GIVES BIRTH TO A CHILD AFTER
RECEIVING THE ASSISTED REPRODUCTIVE TREATMENT;
(II) THE SPOUSE OR DOMESTIC PARTNER OF THE WOMAN WHO
GIVES BIRTH TO A CHILD AFTER RECEIVING THE ASSISTED REPRODUCTIVE
TREATMENT; OR
(III) THE CHILD BORN AS A RESULT OF THE ASSISTED
REPRODUCTIVE TREATMENT.
(2) A CHILD BORN AS A RESULT OF ASSISTED REPRODUCTIVE
TREATMENT PROVIDED BY A PERSON IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION IS ENTITLED TO A QUALIFIED PROTECTIVE ORDER ALLOWING THE CHILD
ACCESS TO THE PERSONAL MEDICAL RECORDS AND HEALTH HISTORY OF THE
PERSON.
(3) A CIVIL ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE FILED:

HOUSE BILL 645 3
(I) WITHIN 10 YEARS AFTER THE CHILD BORN AS A RESULT OF
THE ASSISTED REPRODUCTIVE TREATMENT REACHES THE AGE OF 18 YEARS;
(II) WITHIN 20 YEARS AFTER THE DAY ON WHICH THE ASSISTED
REPRODUCTIVE TREATMENT WAS PROVIDED; OR
(III) WITHIN 2 YEARS AFTER THE DAY ON WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL
FIRST DISCOVERS SUFFICIENT EVIDENCE THROUGH DNA ANALYSIS THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL HAS A CAUSE OF ACTION AGAINST A PERSON UNDER THIS SECTION.
(4) A PLAINTIFF WHO PREVAILS IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS
SECTION IS ENTITLED TO:
(I) THE COSTS OF THE ASSISTED REPRODUCTIVE TREATMENT;
(II) LIQUIDATED DAMAGES NOT TO EXCEED $50,000;
(III) ECONOMIC AND NONECONOMIC COMPENSATORY DAMAGES;
AND
(IV) (III) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COSTS.
(D) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A PERSON FROM
PURSUING ANY OTHER REMEDY PROVIDED BY LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.